Vermont, session 2025-2026, H625.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. chapter 105, subchapter 4 is added to read:
Subchapter 4. Interstate Massage Compact
§ 5430. INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT; ADOPTION
This subchapter is the Vermont adoption of the Interstate Massage
Compact. The form, format, and text of the Compact have been conformed to
the conventions of the Vermont Statutes Annotated. It is the intent of the
General Assembly that this subchapter be interpreted as substantively the same
as the Interstate Massage Compact that is enacted by other Compact member
states.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 2 of 43
§ 5431. PURPOSE
The purpose of this compact is to reduce the burdens on state governments
and to facilitate the interstate practice and regulation of massage therapy with
the goal of improving public access to, and the safety of, massage therapy
services. Through this compact, the member states seek to establish a
regulatory framework which provides for a new multistate licensing program.
Through this additional licensing pathway, the member states seek to provide
increased value and mobility to licensed massage therapists in the member
states, while ensuring the provision of safe, competent, and reliable services to
the public. This compact is designed to achieve the following objectives, and
the member states hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto:
(1) increase public access to massage therapy services by providing for a
multistate licensing pathway;
(2) enhance the member states’ ability to protect the public’s health and
safety;
(3) enhance the member states’ ability to prevent human trafficking and
licensure fraud;
(4) encourage the cooperation of member states in regulating the
multistate practice of massage therapy;
(5) support relocating military members and their spouses;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 3 of 43
(6) facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and
disciplinary information between the member states;
(7) create an interstate commission that will exist to implement and
administer the Compact;
(8) allow a member state to hold a licensee accountable, even where that
licensee holds a multistate license;
(9) create a streamlined pathway for licensees to practice in member
states, thus increasing the mobility of duly licensed massage therapists; and
(10) serve the needs of licensed massage therapists and the public
receiving their services; however,
(11) nothing in this compact is intended to prevent a state from
enforcing its own laws regarding the practice of massage therapy.
§ 5432. DEFINITIONS
As used in this compact, except as otherwise provided and subject to
clarification by the rules of the Commission, the following definitions shall
govern the terms herein:
(1) “Active military member” means any person with full-time duty
status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the
National Guard and Reserve.
(2) “Adverse action” means any administrative, civil, equitable, or
criminal action permitted by a member state’s laws which is imposed by a
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 4 of 43
licensing authority or other regulatory body against a licensee, including
actions against an individual’s authorization to practice such as revocation,
suspension, probation, surrender in lieu of discipline, monitoring of the
licensee, limitation of the licensee’s practice, or any other encumbrance on
licensure affecting an individual’s ability to practice massage therapy,
including the issuance of a cease and desist order.
(3) “Alternative program” means a non-disciplinary monitoring or
prosecutorial diversion program approved by a member state’s licensing
authority.
(4) “Authorization to practice” means a legal authorization by a remote
state pursuant to a multistate license permitting the practice of massage therapy
in that remote state, which shall be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of
the licensing authority in that remote state.
(5) “Background check” means the submission of an applicant’s
criminal history record information, as further defined in 28 C.F.R. § 20.3(d),
as amended from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and the agency
responsible for retaining state criminal records in the applicant’s home state.
(6) “Charter member states” means member states who have enacted
legislation to adopt this compact where such legislation predates the effective
date of this compact as defined in section 5441 of this title.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 5 of 43
(7) “Commission” means the government agency whose membership
consists of all states that have enacted this compact, which is known as the
Interstate Massage Compact Commission, as defined in section 5437 of this
title, and which shall operate as an instrumentality of the member states.
(8) “Continuing competence” means a requirement, as a condition of
license renewal, to provide evidence of participation in, and completion of,
educational or professional activities that maintain, improve, or enhance
massage therapy fitness to practice.
(9) “Current significant investigative information” means investigative
information that a licensing authority, after an inquiry or investigation that
complies with a member state’s due process requirements, has reason to
believe is not groundless and, if proved true, would indicate a violation of that
state’s laws regarding the practice of massage therapy.
(10) “Data system” means a repository of information about licensees
who hold multistate licenses, which may include but is not limited to license
status, investigative information, and adverse actions.
(11) “Disqualifying event” means any event which shall disqualify an
individual from holding a multistate license under this compact, which the
Commission may by rule specify.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 6 of 43
(12) “Encumbrance” means a revocation or suspension of, or any
limitation or condition on, the full and unrestricted practice of massage therapy
by a licensing authority.
(13) “Executive committee” means a group of delegates elected or
appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the
Commission.
(14) “Home state” means the member state which is a licensee’s primary
state of residence where the licensee holds an active single-state license.
(15) “Investigative information” means information, records, or
documents received or generated by a licensing authority pursuant to an
investigation or other inquiry.
(16) “Licensing authority” means a state’s regulatory body responsible
for issuing massage therapy licenses or otherwise overseeing the practice of
massage therapy in that state.
(17) “Licensee” means an individual who currently holds a license from
a member state to fully practice massage therapy, whose license is not a
student, provisional, temporary, inactive, or other similar status.
(18) “Massage therapy,” “massage therapy services,” and the “practice
of massage therapy” mean the care and services provided by a licensee as set
forth in the member state’s statutes and regulations in the state where the
services are being provided.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 7 of 43
(19) “Member state” means any state that has adopted this compact.
(20) “Multistate license” means a license that consists of authorizations
to practice massage therapy in all remote states pursuant to this compact,
which shall be subject to the enforcement jurisdiction of the licensing authority
in a licensee’s home state.
(21) “Remote state” means any member state, other than the licensee’s
home state.
(22) “Rule” means any opinion or regulation promulgated by the
Commission under this compact, which shall have the force of law.
(23) “Single-state license” means a current, valid authorization issued
by a member state’s licensing authority allowing an individual to fully practice
massage therapy, that is not a restricted, student, provisional, temporary, or
inactive practice authorization and authorizes practice only within the issuing
state.
(24) “State” means a state, territory, possession of the United States, or
the District of Columbia.
§ 5433. MEMBER STATE REQUIREMENTS
(a) To be eligible to join this compact, and to maintain eligibility as a
member state, a state must:
(1) license and regulate the practice of massage therapy;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 8 of 43
(2) have a mechanism or entity in place to receive and investigate
complaints from the public, regulatory or law enforcement agencies, or the
Commission about licensees practicing in that state;
(3) accept passage of a psychometrically valid national examination as a
criterion for massage therapy licensure in that state; for purposes of this
compact, such examination shall not include a state-administered examination
but shall be inclusive of the following:
(A) the massage and bodywork licensure examination; or
(B) the National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage &
Bodywork prior to January 1, 2015; or
(C) the substantial equivalent of the foregoing which the Commission
may approve by rule;
(4) require that licensees satisfy educational requirements prior to being
licensed to provide massage therapy services to the public in that state;
(5) implement procedures for requiring the background check of
applicants for a multistate license, and for the reporting of any disqualifying
events, including but not limited to obtaining and submitting, for each licensee
holding a multistate license and each applicant for a multistate license,
fingerprint or other biometric-based information to the Federal Bureau of
Investigation for background checks; receiving the results of the Federal
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 9 of 43
Bureau of Investigation record search on background checks; and considering
the results of such a background check in making licensure decisions;
(6) have continuing competence requirements as a condition for license
renewal;
(7) participate in the data system, including through the use of unique
identifying numbers as described herein;
(8) notify the Commission and other member states, in compliance with
the terms of the Compact and rules of the Commission, of any disciplinary
action taken by the state against a licensee practicing under a multistate license
in that state, or of the existence of investigative information or current
significant investigative information regarding a licensee practicing in that
state pursuant to a multistate license;
(9) comply with the rules of the Commission; and
(10) accept licensees with valid multistate licenses from other member
states as established herein.
(b) Individuals not residing in a member state shall continue to be able to
apply for a member state’s single-state license as provided under the laws of
each member state. However, the single-state license granted to those
individuals shall not be recognized as granting a multistate license for massage
therapy in any other member state.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 10 of 43
(c) Nothing in this compact shall affect the requirements established by a
member state for the issuance of a single-state license.
(d) A multistate license issued to a licensee shall be recognized by each
remote state as an authorization to practice massage therapy in each remote
state.
§ 5434. MULTISTATE LICENSE REQUIREMENTS
(a) To qualify for a multistate license under this compact, and to maintain
eligibility for such a license, an applicant must:
(1) hold an active single-state license to practice massage therapy in the
applicant’s home state;
(2) satisfy one of the following:
(A) completion of at least 625 hours of massage therapy education;
or
(B) graduation from an educational program that meets the minimum
qualifications for licensure in the home state and two years of continuous
licensure with a single-state license in good standing in the home state (except
as provided in section 5436 of this title); or
(C) satisfaction of the substantial equivalent of the foregoing which
the Commission may approve by rule;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 11 of 43
(3) successfully pass a psychometrically valid national examination; for
purposes of this compact, such examination shall not include a state-
administered examination but shall be inclusive of the following:
(A) the massage and bodywork licensure examination; or
(B) the National Certification Board for Therapeutic Massage &
Bodywork prior to January 1, 2015; or
(C) the substantial equivalent of the foregoing which the Commission
may approve by rule;
(4) submit to a background check;
(5) have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an
agreed disposition, of a felony offense under applicable state or federal
criminal law, within five years prior to the date of their application, where such
a time period shall not include any time served for the offense, and provided
that the applicant has completed any and all requirements arising as a result of
any such offense;
(6) have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an
agreed disposition, of a misdemeanor offense related to the practice of massage
therapy under applicable state or federal criminal law, within two years prior to
the date of their application where such a time period shall not include any
time served for the offense, and provided that the applicant has completed any
and all requirements arising as a result of any such offense;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 12 of 43
(7) have not been convicted or found guilty, or have entered into an
agreed disposition, of any offense, whether a misdemeanor or a felony, under
state or federal law, at any time, relating to any of the following:
(A) kidnapping;
(B) human trafficking;
(C) human smuggling;
(D) sexual battery, sexual assault, or any related offenses; or
(E) any other category of offense which the Commission may by rule
designate;
(8) have not previously held a massage therapy license which was
revoked by, or surrendered in lieu of discipline to, an applicable licensing
authority;
(9) have no history of any adverse action on any occupational or
professional license within two years prior to the date of their application; and
(10) pay all required fees.
(b) A multistate license granted pursuant to this compact may be effective
for a definite period of time concurrent with the renewal of the home state
license.
(c) A licensee practicing in a member state is subject to all scope of
practice laws governing massage therapy services in that state.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 13 of 43
(d) The practice of massage therapy under a multistate license granted
pursuant to this compact will subject the licensee to the jurisdiction of the
licensing authority, the courts, and the laws of the member state in which the
massage therapy services are provided.
§ 5435. AUTHORITY OF INTERSTATE MASSAGE COMPACT
COMMISSION AND MEMBER STATE LICENSING
AUTHORITIES
(a) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state
to enact and enforce laws, regulations, or other rules related to the practice of
massage therapy in that state, where those laws, regulations, or other rules are
not inconsistent with the provisions of this compact.
(b) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a member state
to take adverse action against a licensee’s single-state license to practice
massage therapy in that state.
(c) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a remote state to
take adverse action against a licensee’s authorization to practice in that state.
(d) Nothing in this compact, nor any rule of the Commission, shall be
construed to limit, restrict, or in any way reduce the ability of a licensee’s
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 14 of 43
home state to take adverse action against a licensee’s multistate license based
upon information provided by a remote state.
(e) Insofar as practical, a member state’s licensing authority shall cooperate
with the Commission and with each entity exercising independent regulatory
authority over the practice of massage therapy according to the provisions of
this compact.
§ 5436. ADVERSE ACTIONS
(a) A licensee’s home state shall have exclusive power to impose an
adverse action against a licensee’s multistate license issued by the home state.
(b) A home state may take adverse action on a multistate license based on
the investigative information, current significant investigative information, or
adverse action of a remote state.
(c) A home state shall retain authority to complete any pending
investigations of a licensee practicing under a multistate license who changes
their home state during the course of such an investigation. The licensing
authority shall also be empowered to report the results of such an investigation
to the Commission through the data system as described herein.
(d) Any member state may investigate actual or alleged violations of the
scope of practice laws in any other member state for a massage therapist who
holds a multistate license.
(e) A remote state shall have the authority to:
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 15 of 43
(1) take adverse actions against a licensee’s authorization to practice;
(2) issue cease and desist orders or impose an encumbrance on a
licensee’s authorization to practice in that state;
(3) issue subpoenas for both hearings and investigations that require the
attendance and testimony of witnesses, as well as the production of evidence.
Subpoenas issued by a licensing authority in a member state for the attendance
and testimony of witnesses or the production of evidence from another member
state shall be enforced in the latter state by any court of competent jurisdiction,
according to the practice and procedure of that court applicable to subpoenas
issued in proceedings before it. The issuing licensing authority shall pay any
witness fees, travel expenses, mileage, and other fees required by the service
statutes of the state in which the witnesses or evidence are located;
(4) if otherwise permitted by state law, recover from the affected
licensee the costs of investigations and disposition of cases resulting from any
adverse action taken against that licensee; and
(5) take adverse action against the licensee’s authorization to practice in
that state based on the factual findings of another member state.
(f) If an adverse action is taken by the home state against a licensee’s
multistate license or single-state license to practice in the home state, the
licensee’s authorization to practice in all other member states shall be
deactivated until all encumbrances have been removed from such license. All
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 16 of 43
home state disciplinary orders that impose an adverse action against a licensee
shall include a statement that the massage therapist’s authorization to practice
is deactivated in all member states during the pendency of the order.
(g) If adverse action is taken by a remote state against a licensee’s
authorization to practice, that adverse action applies to all authorizations to
practice in all remote states. A licensee whose authorization to practice in a
remote state is removed for a specified period of time is not eligible to apply
for a new multistate license in any other state until the specific time for
removal of the authorization to practice has passed and all encumbrance
requirements are satisfied.
(h) Nothing in this compact shall override a member state’s authority to
accept a licensee’s participation in an alternative program in lieu of adverse
action. A licensee’s multistate license shall be suspended for the duration of
the licensee’s participation in any alternative program.
(i)(1) In addition to the authority granted to a member state by its
respective scope of practice laws or other applicable state law, a member state
may participate with other member states in joint investigations of licensees.
(2) Member states shall share any investigative, litigation, or compliance
materials in furtherance of any joint or individual investigation initiated under
the Compact.
§ 5437. ACTIVE MILITARY MEMBER AND THEIR SPOUSES
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 17 of 43
Active military member, or their spouses, shall designate a home state
where the individual has a current license to practice massage therapy in good
standing. The individual may retain their home state designation during any
period of service when that individual or their spouse is on active-duty
assignment. Further, active military members or their spouses shall satisfy the
requirements of subdivision 5433(a)(2) of this title by successful graduation
from an educational program that meets the minimum qualifications for
licensure in the designated home state.
§ 5438. ESTABLISHMENT AND OPERATION OF INTERSTATE
MASSAGE COMPACT COMMISSION
(a) Establishment. The Compact member states hereby create and establish
a joint government agency whose membership consists of all member states
that have enacted the Compact known as the Interstate Massage Compact
Commission. The Commission is an instrumentality of the Compact states
acting jointly and not an instrumentality of any one state. The Commission
shall come into existence on or after the effective date of the Compact as set
forth in section 5441 of this title.
(b) Membership, voting, and meetings.
(1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one delegate selected
by that member state’s state licensing authority.
(2) The delegate shall be either:
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 18 of 43
(A) a member of the state licensing authority; or
(B) the primary administrative officer of the state licensing authority
or their designee.
(3) The Commission shall by rule or bylaw establish a term of office for
delegates and may by rule or bylaw establish term limits.
(4) The Commission may recommend removal or suspension of any
delegate from office.
(5) A member state’s state licensing authority shall fill any vacancy of
its delegate occurring on the Commission within 60 days of the vacancy.
(6) Each delegate shall be entitled to one vote on all matters that are
voted on by the Commission.
(7) The Commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year.
additional meetings may be held as set forth in the bylaws. The Commission
may meet by telecommunication, video conference, or other similar electronic
means.
(c) Powers. The Commission shall have the following powers:
(1) establish the fiscal year of the Commission;
(2) establish code of conduct and conflict of interest policies;
(3) adopt rules and bylaws;
(4) maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 19 of 43
(5) meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of
this compact, the Commission’s rules, and the bylaws;
(6) initiate and conclude legal proceedings or actions in the name of the
Commission, provided that the standing of any state licensing authority to sue
or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected;
(7) maintain and certify records and information provided to a member
state as the authenticated business records of the Commission, and designate
an agent to do so on the Commission’s behalf;
(8) purchase and maintain insurance and bonds;
(9) borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but
not limited to, employees of a member state;
(10) conduct an annual financial review;
(11) hire employees, elect or appoint officers, fix compensation, define
duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of
the Compact, and establish the Commission’s personnel policies and programs
relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related
personnel matters;
(12) assess and collect fees;
(13) accept any and all appropriate gifts, donations, grants of money,
other sources of revenue, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 20 of 43
receive, utilize, and dispose of the same; provided that at all times the
Commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest;
(14) lease, purchase, retain, own, hold, improve, or use any property,
real, personal, or mixed, or any undivided interest therein;
(15) sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or
otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed;
(16) establish a budget and make expenditures;
(17) borrow money;
(18) appoint committees, including standing committees, composed of
members, state regulators, state legislators or their representatives, and
consumer representatives, and such other interested persons as may be
designated in this compact and the bylaws;
(19) the Commission may elect up to two ex-officio, nonvoting
members of the Commission as specified in the Commission’s bylaws;
(20) accept and transmit complaints from the public, regulatory or law
enforcement agencies, or the Commission, to the relevant member state(s)
regarding potential misconduct of licensees;
(21) elect a chair, vice chair, secretary, and treasurer and such other
officers of the Commission as provided in the Commission’s bylaws;
(22) establish and elect an executive committee, including a chair and a
vice chair;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 21 of 43
(23) adopt and provide to the member states an annual report;
(24) determine whether a state’s adopted language is materially different
from the model Compact language such that the state would not qualify for
participation in the Compact; and
(25) perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to
achieve the purposes of this compact.
(d) Executive committee.
(1) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the
Commission according to the terms of this compact. The powers, duties, and
responsibilities of the executive committee shall include:
(A) overseeing the day-to-day activities of the administration of the
Compact including compliance with the provisions of the Compact, the
Commission’s rules and bylaws, and other such duties as deemed necessary;
(B) recommending to the Commission changes to the rules or
bylaws, changes to this compact legislation, fees charged to Compact member
states, fees charged to licensees, and other fees;
(C) ensuring Compact administration services are appropriately
provided, including by contract;
(D) preparing and recommending the budget;
(E) maintaining financial records on behalf of the Commission;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 22 of 43
(F) monitoring Compact compliance of member states and providing
compliance reports to the Commission;
(G) establishing additional committees as necessary;
(H) exercise the powers and duties of the Commission during the
interim between Commission meetings, except for adopting or amending rules,
adopting or amending bylaws, and exercising any other powers and duties
expressly reserved to the Commission by rule or bylaw; and
(I) other duties as provided in the rules or bylaws of the Commission.
(2) The executive committee shall be composed of seven voting
members as follows:
(A) the Chair and Vice Chair of the Commission and any other
members of the Commission who serve on the executive committee shall be
voting members of the executive committee; and
(B) other than the Chair, Vice Chair, Secretary, and Treasurer, the
Commission shall elect three voting members from the current membership of
the Commission.
(3) The Commission may remove any member of the executive
committee as provided in the Commission’s bylaws.
(4) The executive committee shall meet at least annually.
(A) Executive committee meetings shall be open to the public, except
that the executive committee may meet in a closed, non-public session of a
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 23 of 43
public meeting when dealing with any of the matters covered under
subdivision (f)(4) of this section.
(B) The executive committee shall give five business days advance
notice of its public meetings, posted on its website and as determined to
provide notice to persons with an interest in the public matters the executive
committee intends to address at those meetings.
(5) The executive committee may hold an emergency meeting when
acting for the Commission to:
(A) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(B) prevent a loss of Commission or participating state funds; or
(C) protect public health and safety.
(e) Annual report. The Commission shall adopt and provide to the member
states an annual report.
(f) Meetings of the Commission.
(1) All meetings of the Commission that are not closed pursuant to this
subsection shall be open to the public. Notice of public meetings shall be
posted on the Commission’s website at least 30 days prior to the public
meeting.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection, the Commission
may convene an emergency public meeting by providing at least 24 hours prior
notice on the Commission’s website, and any other means as provided in the
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 24 of 43
Commission’s rules, for any of the reasons it may dispense with notice of
proposed rulemaking under subsection 5439(l) of this subchapter. The
Commission’s legal counsel shall certify that one of the reasons justifying an
emergency public meeting has been met.
(3) Notice of all Commission meetings shall provide the time, date, and
location of the meeting, and if the meeting is to be held or accessible via
telecommunication, video conference, or other electronic means, the notice
shall include the mechanism for access to the meeting.
(4) The Commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting for
the Commission to discuss:
(A) non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the
Compact;
(B) the employment, compensation, discipline or other matters,
practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to
the Commission’s internal personnel practices and procedures;
(C) current or threatened discipline of a licensee by the Commission
or by a member state’s licensing authority;
(D) current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation;
(E) negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods,
services, or real estate;
(F) accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 25 of 43
(G) trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is
privileged or confidential;
(H) information of a personal nature where disclosure would
constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy;
(I) investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes;
(J) information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on
behalf of or for use of the Commission or other committee charged with
responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant
to the Compact;
(K) legal advice;
(L) matters specifically exempted from disclosure to the public by
federal or member state law; or
(M) other matters as promulgated by the Commission by rule.
(5) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed, the presiding officer
shall state that the meeting will be closed and reference each relevant
exempting provision, and such reference shall be recorded in the minutes.
(6) The Commission shall keep minutes that fully and clearly describe
all matters discussed in a meeting and shall provide a full and accurate
summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of
the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action
shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 26 of 43
meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release only by a majority vote of
the Commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction.
(g) Financing of the Commission.
(1) The Commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the
reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities.
(2) The Commission may accept any and all appropriate sources of
revenue, donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and
services.
(3) The Commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from
each member state and impose fees on licensees of member states to whom it
grants a multistate license to cover the cost of the operations and activities of
the Commission and its staff, which must be in a total amount sufficient to
cover its annual budget as approved each year for which revenue is not
provided by other sources. The aggregate annual assessment amount for
member states shall be allocated based upon a formula that the Commission
shall promulgate by rule.
(4) The Commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to
securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the Commission
pledge the credit of any member states, except by and with the authority of the
member state.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 27 of 43
(5) The Commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and
disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the Commission shall be
subject to the financial review and accounting procedures established under its
bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the Commission
shall be subject to an annual financial review by a certified or licensed public
accountant, and the report of the financial review shall be included in and
become part of the annual report of the Commission.
(h) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification.
(1) The members, officers, executive director, employees, and
representatives of the Commission shall be immune from suit and liability,
both personally and in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or
loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising
out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred, or that the
person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing
occurred, within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities; provided that nothing in this subdivision shall be construed to
protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or
liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that
person. the procurement of insurance of any type by the Commission shall not
in any way compromise or limit the immunity granted hereunder.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 28 of 43
(2) The Commission shall defend any member, officer, executive
director, employee, and representative of the Commission in any civil action
seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or
omission that occurred within the scope of Commission employment, duties, or
responsibilities, or as determined by the Commission that the person against
whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that
nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining their
own counsel at their own expense; and provided further that the actual or
alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person’s intentional or
willful or wanton misconduct.
(3) The Commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member,
officer, executive director, employee, and representative of the Commission
for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person
arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within
the scope of Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such
person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of
Commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual
or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful
or wanton misconduct of that person.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 29 of 43
(4) Nothing herein shall be construed as a limitation on the liability of
any licensee for professional malpractice or misconduct, which shall be
governed solely by any other applicable state laws.
(5) Nothing in this compact shall be interpreted to waive or otherwise
abrogate a member state’s state action immunity or state action affirmative
defense with respect to antitrust claims under the Sherman Act, Clayton Act, or
any other state or federal antitrust or anticompetitive law or regulation.
(6) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to be a waiver of
sovereign immunity by the member states or by the Commission.
§ 5439. DATA SYSTEM
(a) The Commission shall provide for the development, maintenance,
operation, and utilization of a coordinated database and reporting system.
(b) The Commission shall assign each applicant for a multistate license a
unique identifier, as determined by the rules of the Commission.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of state law to the contrary, a
member state shall submit a uniform data set to the data system on all
individuals to whom this compact is applicable as required by the rules of the
Commission, including:
(1) identifying information;
(2) licensure data;
(3) adverse actions against a license and information related thereto;
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 30 of 43
(4) non-confidential information related to alternative program
participation, the beginning and ending dates of such participation, and other
information related to such participation;
(5) any denial of application for licensure, and the reasons for such
denial, excluding the reporting of any criminal history record information
where prohibited by law;
(6) the existence of investigative information;
(7) the existence presence of current significant investigative
information; and
(8) other information that may facilitate the administration of this
compact or the protection of the public, as determined by the rules of the
Commission.
(d) The records and information provided to a member state pursuant to
this compact or through the data system, when certified by the Commission or
an agent thereof, shall constitute the authenticated business records of the
Commission and shall be entitled to any associated hearsay exception in any
relevant judicial, quasi-judicial, or administrative proceedings in a member
state.
(e) The existence of current significant investigative information and the
existence of investigative information pertaining to a licensee in any member
state will only be available to other member states.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 31 of 43
(f) It is the responsibility of the member states to report any adverse action
against a licensee who holds a multistate license and to monitor the database to
determine whether adverse action has been taken against such a licensee or
license applicant. Adverse action information pertaining to a licensee or
license applicant in any member state will be available to any other member
state.
(g) Member states contributing information to the data system may
designate information that may not be shared with the public without the
express permission of the contributing state.
(h) Any information submitted to the data system that is subsequently
expunged pursuant to federal law or the laws of the member state contributing
the information shall be removed from the data system.
§ 5440. RULEMAKING
(a) The Commission shall promulgate reasonable rules in order to
effectively and efficiently implement and administer the purposes and
provisions of the Compact. A rule shall be invalid and have no force or effect
only if a court of competent jurisdiction holds that the rule is invalid because
the Commission exercised its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond
the scope and purposes of the Compact, or the powers granted hereunder, or
based upon another applicable standard of review.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 32 of 43
(b) The rules of the Commission shall have the force of law in each
member state, provided however that where the rules of the Commission
conflict with the laws of the member state that establish the member state’s
scope of practice as held by a court of competent jurisdiction, the rules of the
Commission shall be ineffective in that state to the extent of the conflict.
(c) The Commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the
criteria set forth in this section and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules shall
become binding as of the date specified by the Commission for each rule.
(d) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule or
portion of a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner
used to adopt the Compact within four years of the date of adoption of the rule,
then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state or to
any state applying to participate in the Compact.
(e) Rules shall be adopted at a regular or special meeting of the
Commission.
(f) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule, the Commission shall hold a public
hearing and allow persons to provide oral and written comments, data, facts,
opinions, and arguments.
(g) Prior to adoption of a proposed rule by the Commission, and at least 30
days in advance of the meeting at which the Commission will hold a public
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 33 of 43
hearing on the proposed rule, the Commission shall provide a notice of
proposed rulemaking:
(1) on the website of the Commission or other publicly accessible
platform;
(2) to persons who have requested notice of the Commission’s notices of
proposed rulemaking; and
(3) in such other ways as the Commission may by rule specify.
(h) The notice of proposed rulemaking shall include:
(1) the time, date, and location of the public hearing at which the
Commission will hear public comments on the proposed rule and, if different,
the time, date, and location of the meeting where the Commission will consider
and vote on the proposed rule;
(2) if the hearing is held via telecommunication, video conference, or
other electronic means, the Commission shall include the mechanism for
access to the hearing in the notice of proposed rulemaking;
(3) the text of the proposed rule and the reason therefor;
(4) a request for comments on the proposed rule from any interested
person; and
(5) the manner in which interested persons may submit written
comments.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 34 of 43
(i) All hearings will be recorded. A copy of the recording and all written
comments and documents received by the Commission in response to the
proposed rule shall be available to the public.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring a separate hearing
on each rule. Rules may be grouped for the convenience of the Commission at
hearings required by this section.
(k) The Commission shall, by majority vote of all commissioners, take
final action on the proposed rule based on the rulemaking record.
(1) The Commission may adopt changes to the proposed rule, provided
the changes do not enlarge the original purpose of the proposed rule.
(2) The Commission shall provide an explanation of the reasons for
substantive changes made to the proposed rule as well as reasons for
substantive changes not made that were recommended by commenters.
(3) The Commission shall determine a reasonable effective date for the
rule. Except for an emergency as provided in subsection (l) of this section, the
effective date of the rule shall be no sooner than 30 days after the Commission
issuing the notice that it adopted or amended the rule.
(l) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the Commission may
consider and adopt an emergency rule with 24 hours’ notice, provided that the
usual rulemaking procedures provided in the Compact and in this section shall
be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 35 of 43
later than 90 days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this
provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately to:
(1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare;
(2) prevent a loss of Commission or member state funds;
(3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of a rule that is established by
federal law or rule; or
(4) protect public health and safety.
(m) The Commission or an authorized committee of the Commission may
direct revisions to a previously adopted rule for purposes of correcting
typographical errors, errors in format, errors in consistency, or grammatical
errors. Public notice of any revisions shall be posted on the website of the
Commission. The revision shall be subject to challenge by any person for a
period of 30 days after posting. The revision may be challenged only on
grounds that the revision results in a material change to a rule. A challenge
shall be made in writing and delivered to the Commission prior to the end of
the notice period. If no challenge is made, the revision will take effect without
further action. If the revision is challenged, the revision may not take effect
without the approval of the Commission.
(n) No member state’s rulemaking requirements shall apply under this
compact.
§ 5441. OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 36 of 43
(a)(1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each
member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and
appropriate to implement the Compact.
(2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the
Commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent
jurisdiction where the principal office of the Commission is located. The
Commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it
adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings.
Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any
action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct, or any such
similar matter.
(3) The Commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in
any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the Compact and
shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure
to provide the Commission service of process shall render a judgment or order
void as to the Commission, this compact, or promulgated rules.
(b)(1) If the Commission determines that a member state has defaulted in
the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the
promulgated rules, the Commission shall provide written notice to the
defaulting state. The notice of default shall describe the default, the proposed
means of curing the default, and any other action that the Commission may
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 37 of 43
take, and shall offer training and specific technical assistance regarding the
default.
(2) The Commission shall provide a copy of the notice of default to the
other member states.
(c) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be
terminated from the Compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the
delegates of the member states, and all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date
of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of
obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default.
(d) Termination of membership in the Compact shall be imposed only after
all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent
to suspend or terminate shall be given by the Commission to the governor, the
majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state’s legislature, the
defaulting state’s state licensing authority and each of the member states’ state
licensing authority.
(e) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments,
obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination,
including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination.
(f) Upon the termination of a state’s membership from this compact, that
state shall immediately provide notice to all licensees who hold a multistate
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 38 of 43
license within that state of such termination. The terminated state shall
continue to recognize all licenses granted pursuant to this compact for a
minimum of 180 days after the date of said notice of termination.
(g) The Commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found
to be in default or that has been terminated from the Compact, unless agreed
upon in writing between the Commission and the defaulting state.
(h) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the Commission by
petitioning the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the Federal
District where the Commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party
shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney’s
fees.
(i)(1) Upon request by a member state, the Commission shall attempt to
resolve disputes related to the Compact that arise among member states and
between member and non-member states.
(2) The Commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both
mediation and binding dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate.
(j)(1) The Commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall
enforce the provisions of this compact and the Commission’s rules.
(2) By majority vote as provided by Commission rule, the Commission
may initiate legal action against a member state in default in the U.S. District
Court for the District of Columbia or the Federal District where the
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 39 of 43
Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the provisions
of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may include both
injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary,
the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including
reasonable attorney’s fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive
remedies of the Commission. The Commission may pursue any other
remedies available under federal or the defaulting member state’s law.
(3) A member state may initiate legal action against the Commission in
the U.S. District Court for the District of Columbia or the Federal District
where the Commission has its principal offices to enforce compliance with the
provisions of the Compact and its promulgated rules. The relief sought may
include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement
is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation,
including reasonable attorney’s fees.
(4) No individual or entity other than a member state may enforce this
compact against the Commission.
§ 5442. EFFECTIVE DATE, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT
(a) The Compact shall come into effect on the date on which the Compact
statute is enacted into law in the seventh member state.
(1) On or after the effective date of the Compact, the Commission shall
convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 40 of 43
determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially
different than the model Compact statute.
(A) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be
materially different from the model Compact statute shall be entitled to the
default process set forth in section 5440 of this title.
(B) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is
terminated or withdraws from the Compact, the Commission shall remain in
existence and the Compact shall remain in effect even if the number of
member states should be less than seven.
(2) Member states enacting the Compact subsequent to the charter
member states shall be subject to the process set forth in subdivision
5437(c)(24) of this title to determine if their enactments are materially different
from the model Compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in
the Compact.
(3) All actions taken for the benefit of the Commission or in furtherance
of the purposes of the administration of the Compact prior to the effective date
of the Compact or the Commission coming into existence shall be considered
to be actions of the Commission unless specifically repudiated by the
Commission.
(4) Any state that joins the Compact shall be subject to the
Commission’s rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 41 of 43
Compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted
by the Commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the
Compact becomes law in that state.
(b) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a
statute repealing that state’s enactment of the Compact.
(1) A member state’s withdrawal shall not take effect until 180 days
after enactment of the repealing statute.
(2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the
withdrawing state’s licensing authority to comply with the investigative and
adverse action reporting requirements of this compact prior to the effective
date of withdrawal.
(3) Upon the enactment of a statute withdrawing from this compact, a
state shall immediately provide notice of such withdrawal to all licensees
within that state. Notwithstanding any subsequent statutory enactment to the
contrary, such withdrawing state shall continue to recognize all licenses
granted pursuant to this compact for a minimum of 180 days after the date of
such notice of withdrawal.
(c) Nothing contained in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or
prevent any licensure agreement or other cooperative arrangement between a
member state and a non-member state that does not conflict with the provisions
of this compact.
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 42 of 43
(d) This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment
to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state
until it is enacted into the laws of all member states.
§ 5443. CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
(a) This compact and the Commission’s rulemaking authority shall be
liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes, and the implementation
and administration, of the Compact. Provisions of the Compact expressly
authorizing or requiring the promulgation of rules shall not be construed to
limit the Commission’s rulemaking authority solely for those purposes.
(b) The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase,
clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is held by a court of competent
jurisdiction to be contrary to the constitution of any member state, a state
seeking participation in the Compact, or of the United States, or the
applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is
held to be unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, the validity of
the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any other
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby.
(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Commission may
deny a state’s participation in the Compact or, in accordance with the
requirements of subsection 5440(b) of this title, terminate a member state’s
participation in the Compact, if it determines that a constitutional requirement
VT LEG #386238 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.625
2026 Page 43 of 43
of a member state is a material departure from the Compact. Otherwise, if this
compact shall be held to be contrary to the constitution of any member state,
the Compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member
states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all
severable matters.
§ 5444. CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE
LAWS
Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of
a member state that is not inconsistent with the Compact. Any laws, statutes,
regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the
Compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. All permissible
agreements between the Commission and the member states are binding in
accordance with their terms.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386238 v.1